Utah statutes.
40-7-3.   Official representative -- Assistant representative.
The governor shall be the official representative of the state of Utah on the
"Interstate Oil Compact Commission" provided for in the compact to conserve
oil and gas, and shall exercise and perform for the state all of the powers
and duties as members of the Interstate Oil Compact Commission; provided,
however, that he shall have the authority to appoint an assistant
representative who shall act in his stead as the official representative of
the state of Utah as a member of said commission.
